Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-3154] Cooperation with other state
agencies. The commission may be assisted by other state agencies,
including but not limited to the university, the department of education, and
the department of commerce and consumer affairs. [L 2006, c 75, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next